Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14G-108]
Managed care plans; prohibited activity. (a) Except as permitted in this article, no managed care plan shall:

(1) Attempt to
monopolize, or combine or conspire with any other person to monopolize an
insurance market; or

(2) Engage in a
boycott, on a concerted basis, of an insurance market.

(b) Except
as permitted in this article, no managed care plan shall make any arrangement
with any other person that has the purpose or effect of restraining trade
unreasonably or of substantially lessening competition in the business of
insurance. [L 2007, c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next